Tennessee, session 114, HB0369.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 39-14-136, is amended by
designating subsection (b) as subsection (c) and adding the following as a new subsection (b):
(b) It is not a violation of this section for an employee of a school to alter, create,
or duplicate the grade of a student in an educational or academic document, if such
alteration, creation, or duplication is due to the student earning the grade through a
program that allows the student to retake a failed course, exam, or assignment and earn
credit.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring it.
HB0369
001880
- 1 -